District of Columbia statutes.
6-1109.03

Prevention of demolition by neglect.

(a)

If the Mayor determines that an historic landmark or a contributing building or structure within a historic district is threatened by demolition by neglect, upon obtaining an order from the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the Mayor may:

(1)

Require the owner to repair all conditions contributing to demolition by neglect; or

(2)

If the owner does not make the required repairs within a reasonable period of time, enter the property and make the repairs necessary to prevent demolition by neglect.

(b)

The cost of any work undertaken pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be charged to the owner and may be levied by the District of Columbia as a special assessment against the real property. The special assessment shall be a lien against the real property.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 10c
as added Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(n), 53 DCR 6712

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1109.02 and § 6-1110.01.